Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-227
Game, defined.

Game means all game fish, bullfrogs, snapping turtles, tiger salamanders, mussels, crows, game animals, fur-bearing animals, game birds, protected birds, and all other creatures protected by the Game Law.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 37;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 6.